Arkansas, session 2025, HB1841.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 19, Chapter 6, Subchapter 8, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
19-6-846. Arkansas Revenue Investment in Vital EMS Systems (ARRIVES)
Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Arkansas Revenue Investment in Vital EMS Systems
(ARRIVES) Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of such revenues as may be authorized by
law.
(c) The fund shall be distributed by the Department of Health to
*CEB099*
04-09-2025 15:20:06 CEB099

As Engrossed: S4/9/25 HB1841
emergency medical services agencies as set out in § 20-13-1901 et seq. to be
used for emergency medical services.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 13, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 19 — ARRIVES Act

20-13-1901. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Arkansas
Revenue Investment in Vital EMS Systems (ARRIVES) Act".

20-13-1902. Eligibility.
(a) To be eligible for funding under this subchapter, an emergency
medical services agency shall:
(1) Be actively licensed and in good standing in the state for
no less than three (3) years from the date of the application for funding;
(2) Be the provider of record for a county or municipality for a
minimum of twelve (12) months unless the provider of record has been selected
by the county or municipality through a competitive bid process; and
(3) Offer emergency ground ambulance services at the:
(A) Advanced life support level; or
(B) Basic life support level if the funds will be used to
license and operate an ambulance at the advanced live support level within
one year of receiving funding.
(b) An emergency medical services agency is not eligible to apply for
funding under this subchapter if the agency:
(1) Is currently under a state sanction or disciplinary action;
(2) Is currently under a Corporate Integrity Agreement with the
United States Office of the Inspector General;
(3) Provides non-emergency transport;
(4) Is licensed as a volunteer emergency medical services
provider; or
(5) Is a first responder agency that does not provide ambulance
operations at the advanced life support level twenty-four (24) hours a day.

20-13-1903. Application.
04-09-2025 15:20:06 CEB099

As Engrossed: S4/9/25 HB1841
(a) An emergency medical services agency shall apply with the State
Board of Health for funding under this subchapter.
(b) An emergency medical services agency applying for funding under
this subchapter shall include in its application the following documentation:
(1) Proof of state emergency medical services licensure at the
advanced life support level;
(2) A certificate of good standing with the state;
(3) Articles of incorporation; and
(4) Proof of insurance from an agency authorized to write
insurance in the state.

20-13-1904. Disbursement.
(a) Any moneys assessed for disbursement from the Arkansas Revenue
Investment in Vital EMS Systems (ARRIVES) Fund, § 19-6-846, by the Department
of Health shall be disbursed to eligible emergency medical services agencies
as described in subsection (b) of this section.
(b)(1) Each county shall be designated a tier based on its population
at the time of the most recent federal decennial census as follows:
(A) A county having one hundred thousand (100,000)
inhabitants or more is designated Tier 1;
(B) A county having fifty thousand (50,000) inhabitants or
more, but fewer than one hundred thousand (100,000) inhabitants, is
designated Tier 2;
(C) A county having twenty-five thousand (25,000)
inhabitants or more, but fewer than fifty thousand (50,000) inhabitants, is
designated Tier 3;
(D) A county having ten thousand (10,000) inhabitants or
more, but fewer than twenty-five thousand (25,000) inhabitants, is designated
Tier 4; and
(E) A county having fewer than ten thousand (10,000)
inhabitants, is designated Tier 5.
(2) The department shall disburse the moneys to the qualified
emergency medical services agencies of a county in the following percentages
based on the designated tier in which an emergency medical services agency is
located:
(A) Two and seventy-six hundredths percent (2.76%) to
04-09-2025 15:20:06 CEB099

As Engrossed: S4/9/25 HB1841
emergency services agencies in Tier 1 counties;
(B) Three and forty-five hundredths percent (3.45%) to
emergency services agencies in Tier 2 counties;
(C) Twelve and forty-four hundredths percent (12.44%) in
Tier 3 counties;
(D) Sixty and sixty-two hundredths percent (60.62%) in
Tier 4 counties; and
(E) Twenty and seventy-three hundredths percent (20.73%)
in Tier 5 counties.

20-13-1905. Rules.
The State Board of Health shall promulgate rules to implement this
subchapter.

/s/L. Johnson





















04-09-2025 15:20:06 CEB099